ko: 배수 위치: 가운데; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 기타
sk-SK: Umiestnenie odtoku: Stredový; Vľavo; Vpravo; Iné
tr: Tahliye Konumu: Merkez; Sol; Sağ; Diğer
vi: Vị trí thoát nước: Giữa; Trái; Phải; Khác
th: ตำแหน่งท่อระบายน้ำ: กลาง; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Local de drenagem: Centro; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
sv: Avloppsplats: Mitten; Vänster; Höger; Övrigt
ru: Расположение слива: Центр; Слева; Справа; Другой
es: Ubicación del drenaje: Centro; Izquierda; Derecha; Otros
fr: Emplacement de drainage: Centre; Gauche; Droite; Autre
cs: Umístění odtoku: Střední; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Jiné
da: Afløbssted: Center; Venstre; Højre; Andet
de: Abflussposition: Mitte; Links; Rechts; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 排水口位置: 中; 左; 右; 其他
ro-RO: Amplasare scurgere: Central; Stânga; Dreapta; Altele
hr-HR: Mjesto odvoda: Sredina; Lijevo; Desno; Ostalo
pl: Lokalizacja odpływu: Środek; Lewy; Prawy; Inne
nb: Avløpssted: Senter; Venstre; Høyre; Annet
it: Posizione dello scarico: Centro; A sinistra; A destra; Altro
hu: Lefolyó helye: Középen; Balra; Jobb oldalon; Egyéb
ja: 排水管の位置: 中央; 左; 右; その他
en: Drain location: Center; Left; Right; Other
zh-CN: 排水位置: 中间; 左; 右; 其他
sl-SI: Lokacija odtoka: Sredina; Levo; Desno; Drugo
el: Θέση αποχέτευσης: Κέντρο; Αριστερά; Δικαίωμα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Localização da drenagem: Centro; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
nl: Afvoerlocatie: Midden; Links; Rechts; Andere
bg-BG: Местоположение на отводнителен отвор: Централно; Вляво; Вдясно; Други
lt-LT: Sifono vieta: Centras; Kairė; Dešinė; Kita
fi: Viemärin sijainti: Keskusta; Vasen; Oikea; Muu